Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.080

Canvass of returns.

The result of the election, together with the ballots cast, shall be certified by the canvassing authority to the council which shall meet within one week thereafter and shall declare the result which shall be made a matter of record in the journal of the council proceedings. If the vote "For dissolution" be a majority of the registered voters of such city or town voting at such election, such corporation shall be deemed dissolved.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.080. Prior: 1933 c 128 s 1, part; 1897 c 69 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. s8919, part.]

NOTES:

Canvassing returns, generally: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.